Connecticut, session 2026, HB05241.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Triple Bottom Line Justice" or "TBLJ" means the integration of
evidence-based practice, rule of law and meaningful community
engagement to tackle health, environmental and economic challenges
faced by children, families and communities.
(2) "Brownfields to Healthfields" or "B2H" means the TBLJ
methodology for community-led brownfield redevelopment in areas
with pollution, disease, poverty and violence to transform contaminated
properties into reuses that strengthen children, family and community
physical and mental health, resiliency, equity and vitality.
(b) The Commissioner of Public Health shall convene a working
group to discuss a Triple Bottom Line Justice demonstration program
relating to B2H that advances healthy, safe and vibrant communities.
Such working group shall include, but need not be limited to, the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection and
representatives of a school of public health. Not later than July 1, 2027,
the Commissioner of Public Health shall submit a report on the activities

Substitute House Bill No. 5241
of the working group, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public health and the
environment.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-13 2 of 2